Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-5,117
Authorized agency, defined.

Authorized agency shall mean:

(1) The State Fire Marshal or any local fire department investigation division when authorized or charged with the investigation of fires or explosions at the place where the fire or explosion actually took place;

(2) The colonel of the Nebraska State Patrol;

(3) The county attorney responsible for prosecutions in the county where the fire or explosion occurred; and

(4) A local law enforcement agency in the county where the fire or explosion occurred.

Laws 1979, LB 301, § 3.